Illinois, session 104th, HB3706.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Insurance Portability and 5Accountability Act is amended by changing Section 15 as 6follows: 7    (215 ILCS 97/15)8    Sec. 15. Applicability and scope. This Act applies to all 9health insurance policies and and all health service contracts 10issued, renewed, or delivered for issuance or renewal in this 11State by a health insurance issuer after the effective date of 12this Act. Unless otherwise specifically provided by this Act, 13the standards and requirements imposed by this Act shall 14supersede and replace any and all conflicting, inconsistent or 15less restrictive standards or requirements contained in the 16Illinois Insurance Code, the Health Maintenance Organization 17Act, the Limited Health Service Organization Act, and the 18Voluntary Health Services Plans Act.19(Source: P.A. 90-30, eff. 7-1-97.)